Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2007.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 18, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-1979.04, to read: START_STATUTE32-1979.04. Ivermectin; over-the-counter drug; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, Ivermectin that is formulated for human use may be sold or purchased as an over-the-counter drug without a prescription order or consultation with a health professional. B. For the purposes of this section, "over-the-counter drug" means a drug that may be legally sold and purchased in this state without a prescription order.END_STATUTE